Rhode Island statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 105 School Building Authority

16-105-1.
Legislative findings.

The state of Rhode Island is committed to providing high-quality educational opportunities for all public school students.

School facilities provide more than a place for instruction. The physical learning environment contributes to the successful performance of educational programs designed to meet students’ educational needs.

Every student needs a safe, healthy, and sanitary learning environment that promotes student learning and development.

School construction policies should encourage districts to reduce excess capacity through means such as partnering with other districts, closing buildings, and altering grade configurations in certain buildings to maximize the use of square feet.

In order to maximize limited state resources, the project prioritization process should focus on projects with the most urgent and immediate need.

State-funded school construction project financing should transition from a system that largely reimburses local debt service to one that provides a set amount of financing annually to provide greater stability from a budgetary perspective while guiding limited resources to best use.

History of Section.

P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 9, § 2.

16-105-2.
School building authority established.

The general assembly hereby designates the department of elementary and secondary education as the state’s school building authority with the responsibility to implement a system of state funding for school facilities designed to:

Promote adequate school housing for all public school children in the state; and

Prevent the cost of school housing from interfering with the effective operation of the schools.

History of Section.

P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 9, § 2.

16-105-3.
Roles and responsibilities.

The school building authority roles and responsibilities shall include:

Management of a system with the goal of ensuring equitable and adequate school housing for all public school children in the state;

Prevention of the cost of school housing from interfering with the effective operation of the schools;

Management of school housing aid in accordance with statute;

Reviewing and making recommendations to the council on elementary and secondary education on necessity of school construction applications for state school housing aid and the school building authority capital fund, based on the recommendations of the school building authority advisory board;

Promulgating, managing, and maintaining school construction regulations, standards, and guidelines applicable to the school housing program, based on the recommendations of the school building authority advisory board, created in §

16-105-8

. Said regulations shall require conformance with the minority business enterprise requirements set forth in §

37-14.1-6

;

Developing a prequalification and review process for prime contractors, architects, and engineers seeking to bid on projects in excess of ten million dollars ($10,000,000) in total costs subject to inflation. Notwithstanding any general laws to the contrary, a prequalification shall be valid for a maximum of two (2) years from the date of issuance. Factors to be considered by the school building authority in granting a prequalification to prime contractors shall include, but not be limited to, the contractor’s history of completing complex projects on time and on budget, track record of compliance with applicable environmental and safety regulations, evidence that completed prior projects prioritized the facility’s future maintainability, and compliance with applicable requirements for the use of women and minority owned subcontractors;

At least annually, a list of prequalified contractors, architects, and engineers shall be publicly posted with all other program information;

Providing technical assistance and guidance to school districts on the necessity of school construction application process;

Providing technical advice and assistance, training, and education to cities, towns, and/or local education agencies and to general contractors, subcontractors, construction or project managers, designers and others in planning, maintenance, and establishment of school facility space;

Developing a project priority system, based on the recommendations of the school building authority advisory board, in accordance with school construction regulations for the school building authority capital fund, subject to review and, if necessary, to be revised on intervals not to exceed five (5) years. Project priorities shall include, but not be limited to, the following order of priorities:

Projects to replace or renovate a building that is structurally unsound or otherwise in a condition seriously jeopardizing the health and safety of school children where no alternative exists;

Projects needed to prevent loss of accreditation;

Projects needed for the replacement, renovation, or modernization of the HVAC system in any schoolhouse to increase energy conservation and decrease energy-related costs in said schoolhouse;

Projects needed to replace or add to obsolete buildings in order to provide for a full range of programs consistent with state and approved local requirements; and

Projects needed to comply with mandatory, instructional programs;

Maintaining a current list of requested school projects and the priority given them;

Collecting and maintaining readily available data on all the public school facilities in the state;

Collecting, maintaining, and making publicly available quarterly progress reports of all ongoing school construction projects that shall include, at a minimum, the costs of the project and the time schedule of the project;

Recommending policies and procedures designed to reduce borrowing for school construction programs at both state and local levels;

At least every five (5) years, conducting a needs survey to ascertain the capital construction, reconstruction, maintenance, and other capital needs for schools in each district of the state, including public charter schools;

Developing a formal enrollment projection model or using projection models already available;

Encouraging local education agencies to investigate opportunities for the maximum utilization of space in and around the district;

Collecting and maintaining a clearinghouse of prototypical school plans that may be consulted by eligible applicants;

Retaining the services of consultants, as necessary, to effectuate the roles and responsibilities listed within this section;

No district shall receive a combined total of more than twenty (20) incentive percentage points for projects that commence construction by December 30, 2023, and five (5) incentive points for projects that commence construction thereafter; provided further, these caps shall be in addition to amounts received under §§

16-7-40

(a)(1) and

16-7-40

(a)(2). Furthermore, a district’s share shall not be decreased by more than half of its regular share irrespective of the number of incentive points received, nor shall a district’s state share increase by more than half of its regular share, including amounts received under §§

16-7-40(a)(1)

and

16-7-40(a)(2)

, irrespective of the number of incentive points received. Notwithstanding any provision of the general laws to the contrary, the reimbursement or aid received under this chapter or chapter 38.2 of title 45 shall not exceed one hundred percent (100%) of the sum of the total project costs plus interest costs. If a two hundred and fifty million dollar ($250,000,000) general obligation bond is approved on the November 2018 ballot, projects approved between May 1, 2015, and January 1, 2018, are eligible to receive incentive points (above and beyond what the project was awarded at the time of approval) pursuant to §

16-7-39

and § 16-7-40. Provided, however, any project approved during this time period with a project cost in excess of one million five hundred thousand dollars ($1,500,000), which does not include an owner’s program manager and a commissioning agent, shall only be eligible to receive five (5) incentive points. Incentive points awarded pursuant to the provisions of this subsection shall only be applied to reimbursements occurring on or after July 1, 2018. Any project approved between May 1, 2015, and January 1, 2018, that is withdrawn and/or resubmitted for approval shall not be eligible for any incentive points.

History of Section.

P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 9, § 2; P.L. 2018, ch. 47, art. 9, § 3.

16-105-4.
Funding mechanisms for school facilities.

The school building authority within the department shall oversee and manage two distinct funding mechanisms for school facilities: the foundation program for school housing, as set forth in §§

16-7-35

to

16-7-47

, and the school building authority capital fund, as set forth in chapter 38.2 of title 45. The school building authority shall determine the necessity of school construction; establish standards for design and construction of school buildings; ensure that districts have adequate asset protection plans in place to maintain their school facilities; make recommendations to the council on elementary and secondary education for approval of projects for school housing aid reimbursement; and establish a project priority list for projects funded by the school building authority capital fund and school housing aid set forth in §§

16-7-35

to

16-7-47

that shall apply to any projects submitted or reviewed on or after May 1, 2015.

History of Section.

P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 9, § 2.

16-105-5.
Procedure for school building authority capital fund project approval.

The department of elementary and secondary education shall promulgate rules and regulations that establish the process through which a city, town, or LEA may submit an application for school building authority capital funding. The department may also prescribe, without limitation, forms for financial assistance applications. All rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to this chapter shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of chapter 35 of title 42, and shall apply to any projects submitted or reviewed on or after May 1, 2015.

As part of the budget process, the governor shall specify the amount included in his/her budget recommendation that the school building authority may commit to new projects in the ensuing fiscal year, as well as any funding pursuant to §

16-105-7

. Subsequently, the general assembly shall authorize the maximum amount that the school building authority may commit to new projects in the ensuing fiscal year.

Each LEA shall develop, implement, and maintain a comprehensive asset protection plan for every school building, not only buildings for which housing aid or school building authority capital funds are sought or received. Only LEAs that have adequate asset protection plans in place to maintain their school facilities are eligible for funding from the school building authority capital fund. LEAs must annually provide asset protection information to the department of elementary and secondary education. If an LEA fails to provide asset protection information in a fiscal year, it is not eligible to receive school building authority capital funds the next fiscal year.

Upon issuance of the project priority list, the Rhode Island health and educational building corporation shall award financial assistance to cities, towns, and LEAs for approved projects. The corporation may decline to award financial assistance to an approved project which the corporation determines will have a substantial adverse effect on the interests of holders of bonds or other indebtedness of the corporation or the interests of other participants in the financial assistance program, or for good and sufficient cause affecting the finances of the corporation. All financial assistance shall be made pursuant to a loan or financing agreement between the corporation and the city, town or LEA, acting by and through the officer or officers, board, committee, or other body authorized by law, or otherwise its chief executive officer, according to terms and conditions as determined by the corporation, and each loan shall be evidenced and secured by the issue to the corporation of city or town obligations in principal amount, bearing interest at the rate or rates specified in the applicable loan or financing agreement, and shall otherwise bear such terms and conditions as authorized by this chapter and/or the loan or financing agreement.

History of Section.

P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 9, § 2.

16-105-6.
Inspection of approved projects.

For any approved project, the school building authority shall have the authority to inspect the construction and operation thereof to ensure compliance with the provisions of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 9, § 2.

16-105-7.
Expenses incurred by the school building authority.

In order to provide for one-time or limited expenses of the school building authority under this chapter, the Rhode Island health and educational building corporation shall provide funding from the school building authority capital fund, fees generated from the origination of municipal bonds and other financing vehicles used for school construction, and its own reserves. The school building authority shall, by October 1 of each year, report to the governor and the chairs of the senate and house finance committees, the senate fiscal advisor, and the house fiscal advisor the amount sought for expenses for the next fiscal year.

There is also hereby established a restricted-receipt account within the budget of the department of elementary and secondary education entitled “school construction services,” to be financed by the Rhode Island health and educational building corporation’s sub-allotments of fees generated from the origination of municipal bonds and other financing vehicles used for school construction and its own reserves. Effective July 1, 2018, this account shall be utilized for the express purpose of supporting personnel expenditures directly related to the administration of the school construction aid program. Expenditure of all restricted receipts accepted by the department shall be subject to the annual appropriation process and approval by the general assembly.

History of Section.

P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 9, § 2; P.L. 2018, ch. 47, art. 9, § 3; P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 9, § 14.

16-105-8.
School building authority advisory board established.

There is hereby established a school building authority advisory board that shall advise the school building authority regarding the best use of the school building authority capital fund, including the setting of statewide priorities, criteria for project approval, and recommendations for project approval and prioritization.

The school building authority advisory board shall consist of seven (7) members as follows:

The general treasurer, or designee;

The director of the department of administration, who shall serve as chair;

The chair of the Rhode Island health and educational building corporation; and

Four (4) members of the public, appointed by the governor, and who serve at the pleasure of the governor, each of whom shall have expertise in education and/or construction, real estate, or finance. At least one of these four (4) members shall represent a local education agency and at least one of these four (4) members shall be an educator.

In addition to the purposes in subsection (a), the school building authority advisory board shall advise the school building authority on, including but not limited to, the following:

The project priorities for the school building authority capital fund;

Legislation as it may deem desirable or necessary related to the school building authority capital fund and the school housing aid program set forth in §§

16-7-35

to

16-7-47

;

Policies and procedures designed to reduce borrowing for school construction programs at both state and local levels;

Development of a formal enrollment projection model or consideration of using projection models already available;

Processes and procedures necessary to apply for, receive, administer, and comply with the conditions and requirements respecting any grant, gift, or appropriation of property, services, or monies;

The collection and maintenance of a clearinghouse of prototypical school plans which may be consulted by eligible applicants and recommend incentives to utilize these prototypes;

The determination of eligible cost components of projects for funding or reimbursement, including partial or full eligibility for project components for which the benefit is shared between the school and other municipal and community entities;

Development of a long-term capital plan in accordance with needs and projected funding;

Collection and maintenance of data on all the public school facilities in the state, including information on size, usage, enrollment, available facility space, and maintenance;

Advising districts on the conduct of a needs survey to ascertain the capital construction, reconstruction, maintenance, and other capital needs for schools across the state;

The recommendation of policies, rules, and regulations that move the state toward a pay-as-you-go funding system for school construction programs; and

Encouraging local education agencies to investigate opportunities for the maximum utilization of space in and around the district.

History of Section.

P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 9, § 2; P.L. 2018, ch. 47, art. 9, § 3.

16-105-9.
Severability.

If any provision of this chapter or the application of this chapter to any person or circumstances is held invalid, the invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of the chapter, which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this chapter are declared to be severable.

History of Section.

P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 9, § 2.